th: แพทเทิร์นถัก: ลายขัดสาน; บูเคล; ลายเปีย; เชนิลล์; ถักเส้นใหญ่; ถักเส้นเล็กละเอียด; ลายฟิชเชอร์แมน; อินทาร์เซีย; แจ็กการ์ด; ลูกไม้; ตาข่าย; พอยเทล; ลายลอน; ลายซี้ดสติช; ลายวาฟเฟิล; อื่นๆ
sk-SK: Vzor úpletu: Košíkový vzor; Búklé; Osmičkový vzor; Ženilka; Hrubý úplet; Jemný úplet; Rybársky vzor; Intarzia; Žakár; Čipka; Sieťovina; Pointelle; Rebrovaný úplet; Perličkový vzor; Vafľový vzor; Iné
bg-BG: Модел на плетката: Плетка кошница; Букле; Плитки; Шенил; Едра плетка; Фина плетка; Рибарска плетка; Интарзия; Жакард; Дантела; Мрежа; Поантел; Рипс; Оризова плетка; Вафлена плетка; Друго
da: Strikmønster: Kurveflet; Bouclé; Kabel; Chenille; Chunky; Finstrikket; Fisker; Intarsia; Jacquard; Knipling; Mesh; Pointelle; Rib; Perlestrik; Vaffel; Andet
fr: Motif de tricot: Natté; Bouclé; Torsade; Chenille; Grosse maille; Maille fine; Pêcheur; Intarsia; Jacquard; Dentelle; Résille; Pointelle; Côte; Point de riz; Gaufré; Autre
fi: Neulekuvio: Koripunos; Buklee; Palmikko; Senille; Paksu; Ohut neulos; Kalastajaneule; Intarsia; Jacquard; Pitsi; Verkko; Reikäkuvio; Joustin; Helmineule; Vohveli; Muu
zh-TW: 針織花紋: 籃網紋; 圈圈紗; 麻花編織; 雪尼爾; 粗針織; 細針織; 漁夫編織; 嵌花; 緹花; 蕾絲; 網眼; 點狀鏤空; 羅紋; 桂花針; 鬆餅格; 其他
tr: Örgü deseni: Sepet örgü; Bukle; Saç örgü; Şönil; Kalın; İnce ilmekli; Balıkçı; İntarsia; Jakar; Dantel; File; Ajur; Fitilli; Pirinç örgü; Petek; Diğer
nl: Breipatroon: Mandweefsel; Bouclé; Kabel; Chenille; Grof; Fijngebreid; Visserssteek; Intarsia; Jacquard; Kant; Mesh; Pointelle; Rib; Gerstekorrel; Wafel; Anders
pt-BR: Padrão de tricô: Trama de cesta; Bouclé; Trança; Chenille; Grosso; Ponto fino; Pescador; Intarsia; Jacquard; Renda; Malha; Pointelle; Canelado; Ponto arroz; Waffle; Outro
es: Patrón de punto: Cestería; Bouclé; Trenzado; Chenilla; Grueso; Calibre fino; Pescador; Intarsia; Jacquard; Encaje; Malla; Calado; Canalé; Punto de arroz; Waffle; Otro
en: Knit pattern: Basketweave; Bouclé; Cable; Chenille; Chunky; Fine gauge; Fisherman; Intarsia; Jacquard; Lace; Mesh; Pointelle; Rib; Seed stitch; Waffle; Other
hu: Kötési minta: Kosárfonás; Buklé; Csavart; Zsenília; Vaskos (chunky); Finom kötésű; Halászkötés; Intarzia; Jacquard; Csipke; Necc / hálós; Pointelle (áttört); Bordázott; Rizskötés; Gofri / rácsos; Egyéb
sv: Stickmönster: Korgmönster; Bouclé; Flätmönster; Chenille; Grovstickad; Finstickad; Fiskarstickning; Intarsia; Jacquard; Spets; Nätmönster; Pointelle; Ribb; Mosstickning; Våffelmönster; Övrigt
cs: Pletený vzor: Košíkový vzor; Buklé; Copánkový vzor; Žinylka; Hrubý úplet; Jemný úplet; Rybářský vzor; Intarzie; Žakár; Krajka; Síťovina; Pointelle; Žebrování; Perličkový vzor; Vaflový vzor; Jiné
nb: Strikkemønster: Kurvflett; Bouclé; Flette; Chenille; Grovstrikk; Finstrikk; Fiskerstrikk; Intarsia; Jacquard; Blonde; Netting; Pointelle; Ribbestrikk; Perlestrikk; Vaffelstrikk; Annet
vi: Mẫu dệt kim: Đan rổ; Len xù; Vặn thừng; Vải nhung lông; Dày thô; Mũi đan nhỏ; Kiểu đan Fisherman; Intarsia; Jacquard; Ren; Lưới; Pointelle; Gân; Mũi đan hạt giống; Kiểu tổ ong; Khác
ro-RO: Model de tricotat: Împletitură tip coș; Bouclé; Torsade; Chenille; Chunky; Calibru fin; Pescăresc; Intarsia; Jacquard; Dantelă; Plasă; Pointelle; Striat; Punct de orez; Waffle; Altele
pt-PT: Padrão da malha: Trama de cesto; Bouclé; Trança; Chenille; Grosso; Fio fino; Pescador; Intársia; Jacquard; Renda; Malha; Pointelle; Canelado; Ponto de semente; Waffle; Outro
ru: Узор вязки: Плетенка; Букле; Косы; Шенилл; Крупная вязка; Мелкая вязка; Английская резинка; Интарсия; Жаккард; Ажурная вязка; Сетка; Пуантель; В рубчик; Жемчужный узор; Вафельная вязка; Другое
ja: 編み図: バスケットウィーブ; ブークレ; ケーブル; シェニール; チャンキー; ファインゲージ; フィッシャーマン; インターシャ; ジャカード; レース; メッシュ; ポインテール; リブ; シードステッチ; ワッフル; その他
sl-SI: Vzorec pletenja: Vzorec košarice; Bukle; Kitke; Ženilj; Debelo pleteno; Fino pleteno; Ribiški vzorec; Intarzija; Žakard; Čipkasto; Mrežasto; Pointelle; Rebrasto; Rižev vzorec; Vafljasto; Drugo
hr-HR: Uzorak pletenja: Panamski preplet; Bukle; Pletenica; Šenil; Grubo pletivo; Fino pletivo; Ribarski bod; Intarzija; Žakard; Čipka; Mreža; Pointelle; Rebrasto pletivo; Rižin bod; Waffle pletivo; Ostalo
pl: Wzór dzianiny: Splot koszykowy; Bouclé; Warkoczowy; Szenil; Gruby splot; Drobny splot; Splot rybacki; Intarsja; Żakard; Koronkowy; Siatka; Pointelle; Prążkowany; Ścieg perłowy; Waflowy; Inny
zh-CN: 针织图案: 席纹编织; 圈绒编织; 绞花编织; 雪尼尔; 粗针织; 细针织; 渔夫针织; 嵌花编织; 提花编织; 蕾丝编织; 网眼编织; 镂空编织; 罗纹编织; 桂花针; 华夫格针织; 其他
el: Πλεκτό μοτίβο: Μοτίβο καλαθιού; Μπουκλέ; Πλεξούδα; Σενίλ; Χοντρή πλέξη; Λεπτή πλέξη; Fisherman; Ιντάρσια; Ζακάρ; Δαντέλα; Διχτυωτό; Pointelle; Ριπ; Πλέξη σπόρου; Βάφλα; Άλλο
de: Strickmuster: Korbgeflecht; Bouclé; Zopfmuster; Chenille; Grobstrick; Feinstrick; Fischerstrick; Intarsien; Jacquard; Spitze; Mesh; Pointelle; Rippstrick; Perlmuster; Waffelmuster; Sonstige
lt-LT: Mezginio raštas: Krepšelio pynimo (basketweave); Buklė (bouclé); Pynės; Šenilas; Stambaus mezgimo; Smulkaus mezgimo; Žvejo mezgimas; Intarsija; Žakardas; Nėriniai; Tinklelis; Kiauraraštis (pointelle); Stulpeliai (Rib); Perlinis raštas; Vaflių raštas; Kita
ko: 니트 패턴: 바스켓위브; 부클레; 케이블; 셔닐; 청키; 파인 게이지; 피셔맨; 인타르시아; 자카드; 레이스; 메시; 포인트엘; 리브; 시드 스티치; 와플; 기타
it: Modello della maglia: Motivo a cesto; Bouclé; A trecce; Ciniglia; Grosso; Calibro fine; Stile pescatore; Intarsio; Jacquard; Pizzo; Rete; Pointelle; A coste; Punto grana di riso; Nido d'ape; Altro